Utah statutes.
36-23-103.   Committee terms -- Vacancies.
(1)  A legislator serving on the committee shall serve a two-year term or
until the legislator's successor is appointed.
(2) (a)  Except as provided in Subsection (2)(b), a public member shall serve
a three-year term or until the public member's successor is appointed.
(b)  The speaker of the House of Representatives and the president of the
Senate shall, at the time of appointment or reappointment, adjust the length
of terms of the public members to ensure that approximately one of the public
members is appointed every year.
(3)  A legislative or public member of the committee may serve one or more
terms.
(4) (a)  A vacancy occurs:
(i)  when a legislative member ceases to be a member of the Legislature; or
(ii)  when a member of the committee resigns from the committee.
(b)  A vacancy shall be filled by the appointing authority, and the
replacement member shall serve for the remaining unexpired term.
